Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-401
Code, how cited.

Sections 55-401 to 55-481 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Code of Military Justice.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 1, p. 1553;

Laws 2016, LB754, § 7.